Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
CHAPTER 7 Hospitalization and Treatment of
Alcoholics, Drug Dependent
Individuals, and Drug
Abusers

Cross references.

Duties of Department of Human Resources relating to classification and evaluation of drug abuse treatment and education programs, T. 26, C. 5.

Protective services for abused, neglected, or exploited disabled adults, T. 30, C. 5.

Reporting of abuse or exploitation of residents of long-term care facilities, § 31-8-80 et seq.

Rights of persons residing in long-term care facilities generally, § 31-8-100 et seq.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Adult crisis stabilization units, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities, Chapter 82-3-1.

Children and adolescent crisis stabilization units, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Behavioral Health and Disabilities, Chapter 82-4-1.

Law reviews.

For article, “The Olmstead Decision: The Road to Dignity and Freedom,” see 26 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 651 (2010).

For article, “Olmstead’s Promise and Cohousing’s Potential,” see 26 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 663 (2010).

For article, “From the Inside Out: Personal Perspectives of Six Georgians on Their Institutional Experiences,” see 26 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 741 (2010).

For article, “The Constitutional Right to Community Services,” see 26 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 763 (2010).

For article, “Reconsidering Makin v. Hawaii: The Right of Medicaid Beneficiaries to Home-Based Services as an Alternative to Institutionalization,” see 26 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 803 (2010).

For article, “The Potential and Risks of Relying on Title II’s Integration Mandate to Close Segregated Institutions,” see 26 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 855 (2010).

For article, “Beyond Residential Segregation: The Application of Olmstead to Segregated Employment Settings,” see 26 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 875 (2010).

For article, “From Almshouses to Nursing Homes and Community Care: Lessons from Medicaid’s History,” see 26 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 937 (2010).

For note on 1991 amendments to this chapter, see 8 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 121 (1992).

For note, “Deinstitutionalization: Georgia’s Progress in Developing and Implementing an ‘Effectively Working Plan’ as Required by Olmstead v. L.C. ex rel,” see 25 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 699 (2009).